Utah statutes.
13-35-306.   Evidence to be considered in determining cause to relocate existing franchisee or establish a new franchised dealership.

In determining whether a franchisor has established good cause for relocating an existing franchisee or establishing a new franchised dealership for the same line-make in a given relevant market area, the advisory board and the executive director shall consider:

(1)  the amount of business transacted by other franchisees of the same line-make in that relevant market area, as compared to business available to the franchisees;

(2)  the investment necessarily made and obligations incurred by other franchisees of the same line-make in that relevant market area in the performance of their part of their franchisee agreements;

(3)  the permanency of the existing and proposed investment;

(4)  whether it is injurious or beneficial to the public welfare or public interest for an additional franchise to be established; and

(5)  whether the franchisees of the same line-make in that relevant market area are providing adequate service to consumers for the powersport vehicles of the line-make, which shall include the adequacy of:

(a)  the powersport vehicle sale and service facilities;

(b)  equipment;

(c)  supply of vehicle parts; and

(d)  qualified service personnel.



Amended by Chapter 268, 2005 General Session

